Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.640

Rules—Administration of sedation and general anesthesia.

(1) The commission may adopt such rules as it deems necessary to carry out this chapter.

(2) The commission may adopt rules governing administration of sedation and general anesthesia by persons licensed under this chapter, including necessary training, education, equipment, and the issuance of any permits, certificates, or registration as required.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 221; 1988 c 217 s 1; 1986 c 259 s 42; 1977 ex.s. c 5 s 14.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.